District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.36

Regulations.

The Board is authorized to adopt, amend, repeal, and enforce such regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this part, and is further directed to take such steps as are necessary to ensure that the election provided for under this part is held in an efficient manner.

History

June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-72, § 8, 23 DCR 578

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-270.
1973 Ed., § 1-171r.